Nebraska, session 109, LB32.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 49-1474.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
49-1474.01 (1) Except for an individual or individuals acting
independently utilizing their own personal resources or as provided in
subsection (2) of this section, the The person , except an individual or
individuals acting independently utilizing their own personal resources, who
pays for the production, distribution, or posting of a billboard, placard,
poster, pamphlet, or other printed matter relating to a candidate or ballot
question shall cause a disclaimer containing the name and street address of the
person to appear on such matter. The person who pays for a radio or television
advertisement relating to a candidate or ballot question shall cause a
disclaimer containing the name of such person to be included in the
advertisement, and the radio or television station shall, for a period of at
least six months, keep the street address of such person on file and divulge it
to any person upon request.
(2) If a candidate pays for the production, distribution, or posting of a
billboard, placard, poster, pamphlet, or other printed material relating to
such candidate, then the candidate shall cause a disclaimer containing the name
and street address or post office box number of such candidate to appear on
such matter. If a candidate pays for a radio or television advertisement
relating to such candidate, then the candidate shall cause a disclaimer
containing the name of such candidate to be included in the advertisement, and
the radio or television station shall, for a period of at least six months,
keep the street address or post office box number of such candidate on file and
divulge it to any person upon request.
(3) (2) The size and placement of the disclaimer shall be determined by
rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the commission. The rules and
regulations shall exempt from the disclaimer required by this section
windshield stickers, yard signs, bumper stickers, campaign buttons, and
balloons and may also exempt other items relating to a candidate or committee
which are printed or reproduced at the request of such candidate or committee.
(4) (3) Any person who knowingly violates the provisions of this section
shall be guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor.
Sec. 2. Original section 49-1474.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-1-